Washington statutes.
RCW 39.64.085

Authority of operating agencies to levy taxes.

Nothing in this chapter may be deemed to grant to any operating agency organized under chapter 43.52 RCW, or a project of any such operating agency, the authority to levy any tax or assessment not otherwise authorized by law.

[ 1983 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 54.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—Effective dates—1983 2nd ex.s. c 3: See notes following RCW 82.04.255.